pt-PT: Método de fixação do contador de carreiras: Corrente/cordão; Anel de dedo; Marcador suspenso (fecho mosquetão); Marcador de pontos com bloqueio (clipe/fecho); Magnético (para acessório); Montado em agulha; Argola dividida; Autónomo (sem fixação); Outro
bg-BG: Метод за закрепване на брояча на редове: Верижка/връв за врат; Пръстен за ръка; Висящ маркер (карабинка); Заключващ се маркер за бримки (щипка/ключалка); Магнитен (към аксесоар); Монтиран на игла; Разделен пръстен; Самостоятелен (без прикрепване); Друго
ru: Способ крепления счетчика рядов: Цепочка/шнурок; Кольцо на палец; Подвесной маркер (карабин-лобстер); Блокирующийся маркер петель (зажим/замок); Магнитный (к аксессуару); Крепление на спицу; Заводное кольцо; Отдельностоящий (без крепления); Другое
nl: Rijenteller bevestigingsmethode: Ketting-/koord-lanyard; Vingerring; Hangende markering (karabijnsluiting); Vergrendelbare stekenmarkeerder (clip/slot); Magnetisch (aan accessoire); Op naald bevestigd; Splitring; Op zichzelf staand (geen bevestiging); Overige
fi: Kerroslaskurin kiinnitystapa: Ketju-/nyörikiinnitys; Sormirengas; Riippuva merkki (papukaijalukko); Lukittava silmukkamerkki (klipsi/lukko); Magneettinen (lisävarusteeseen); Puikkoon kiinnitettävä; Halkaistu rengas; Erillinen (ei kiinnitystä); Muu
nb: Monteringsmetode for radteller: Kjede/halssnor; Fingerring; Hengende markør (karabinlås); Låsbar maskemarkør (klips/lås); Magnetisk (til tilbehør); Pinnemontert; Splittring; Frittstående (uten feste); Annet
ro-RO: Metodă de fixare a numărătorului de rânduri: Lanț/șnur; Inel pe deget; Marcator suspendat (închizătoare tip clește); Marcator cu blocare (clemă/sistem de blocare); Magnetic (pentru accesoriu); Montat pe andrea; Inel despicat; Independent (fără fixare); Altele
el: Τρόπος στερέωσης μετρητή σειρών: Αλυσίδα/κορδόνι λαιμού; Δαχτυλίδι; Κρεμαστός δείκτης (κούμπωμα καβουράκι); Δείκτης πόντων που ασφαλίζει (κλιπ/κλείδωμα); Μαγνητικός (σε αξεσουάρ); Τοποθετημένος σε βελόνα; Διαιρούμενος κρίκος; Αυτόνομος (χωρίς εξάρτημα σύνδεσης); Άλλο
hr-HR: Način montaže brojača redova: Lančić / vezica od uzice; Prsten za prst; Viseća oznaka (kopča); Oznaka očica s bravicom (kopča/bravica); Magnetski (na dodatak); Postavljeno na iglu; Raskoljeni prsten; Samostalni (bez pričvršćivanja); Ostalo
ko: 행 카운터 장착 방법: 체인/코드 랜야드; 핑거 링; 행잉 마커(랍스터 클래스프); 락킹 스티치 마커(클립/잠금장치); 마그네틱(액세서리 부착용); 바늘 장착형; 스플릿 링; 독립형(부착물 없음); 기타
zh-CN: 行计数器固定方式: 链条/绳索挂绳; 指环; 悬挂标记（龙虾扣）; 锁定线圈记号扣（夹子/锁扣）; 磁吸（在配件上）; 针装式; 开口环; 独立式（无附件）; 其他
ja: 段数カウンターの取り付け方法: チェーン / コードランヤード; フィンガーリング; ハンギングマーカー (カニカン); ロッキングステッチマーカー (クリップ / ロック); マグネット (アクセサリー用); 編み針取り付け; スプリットリング; スタンドアロン (取り付けなし); その他
cs: Způsob montáže počítadla řádků: Řetízek / šňůrka na krk; Prsten na prst; Závěsná značka (karabinka); Uzamykatelná značka ok (sponka/zámeček); Magnetický (na příslušenství); Na jehlici; Spojovací kroužek; Samostatný (bez upevnění); Jiné
it: Metodo di montaggio del contatore di ferri: Catenella/cordino; Ad anello per dito; Marcapunti a sospensione (moschettone); Marcapunti con lucchetto (clip/chiusura); Magnetico (all'accessorio); Montato sul ferro; Anello brisé; Indipendente (nessun attacco); Altro
pl: Metoda mocowania licznika rzędów: Łańcuszek / sznurek do zawieszania; Pierścionek na palec; Wiszący znacznik (zapięcie typu karabińczyk); Zamykany znacznik oczek (klips/zamek); Magnetyczny (do akcesoriów); Zakładany na drut; Kółko rozdzielne; Wolnostojący (bez mocowania); Inny
es: Método de montaje del contador de hileras: Cordón/cadena; Anillo para el dedo; Marcador colgante (cierre de mosquetón); Marcador de puntos con cierre (clip/candado); Magnético (a accesorio); Montado en la aguja; Anillo dividido; Independiente (sin fijación); Otro
de: Befestigungsmethode des Reihenzählers: Ketten-/Kordel-Lanyard; Fingerring; Hängender Markierer (Karabinerverschluss); Verschließbarer Maschenmarkierer (Clip/Schloss); Magnetisch (am Zubehör); Auf der Nadel montiert; Spaltring; Eigenständig (keine Befestigung); Sonstige
sv: Monteringsmetod för radräknare: Kedja/snodd; Fingerring; Hängande markör (karbinhake); Låsbar stickmarkör (klämma/lås); Magnetisk (till tillbehör); Monterad på sticka; Delad ring; Fristående (ingen montering); Övrigt
sl-SI: Način namestitve števca vrstic: Trak z verižico/vrvico; Prstan; Viseči označevalnik (karabinska zaponka); Zaklepni označevalnik zank (sponka/zapah); Magnetno (na pripomoček); Nameščeno na iglo; Razcepni obroček; Samostojno (brez pritrditve); Drugo
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt bộ đếm hàng: Dây xích/dây buộc; Vòng đeo ngón tay; Móc treo (móc càng cua); Đánh dấu mũi đan có khóa (kẹp/khóa); Nam châm (gắn vào phụ kiện); Gắn trên kim; Vòng khuyên mở; Độc lập (không gắn); Khác
tr: Sıra sayacı montaj yöntemi: Zincir/kordon boyun askısı; Yüzük; Asılı işaretleyici (papağan klips); Kilitlemeli ilmek işaretleyici (klips/kilit); Manyetik (aksesuara); Şişe monte; Anahtarlık halkası; Bağımsız (eklenti yok); Diğer
th: วิธีการติดตั้งตัวนับแถว: สายคล้องคอโซ่/เชือก; ห่วงสวมนิ้ว; ห่วงคั่นลายแบบห้อย (ก้ามปู); ห่วงคั่นลายแบบล็อก (คลิป/ล็อก); แม่เหล็ก (ติดอุปกรณ์); สวมเข็ม; ห่วงแยก; ตั้งแยก (ไม่ยึดติด); อื่นๆ
hu: Sorszámláló rögzítési módja: Lánc / zsinór; Ujjgyűrű; Függő jelölő (karabineres); Zárható szemjelölő (csipeszes / záras); Mágneses (kiegészítőhöz); Kötőtűre szerelhető; Osztott gyűrű; Önálló (rögzítés nélkül); Egyéb
zh-TW: 行數計數器安裝方式: 鍊條/掛繩; 戒指; 懸掛標記 (龍蝦扣); 鎖定記號圈 (夾子/鎖); 磁吸 (吸附於配件); 安裝於針上; 鑰匙圈環; 獨立式 (無連接物); 其他
fr: Mode de fixation du compte-rangs: Tour de cou en chaîne/cordon; Bague; Marqueur suspendu (fermoir mousqueton); Marqueur de maille verrouillable (clip/verrou); Magnétique (sur accessoire); Monté sur aiguille; Anneau brisé; Autonome (sans attache); Autre
lt-LT: Eilių skaitiklio tvirtinimo būdas: Pakabutis su grandinėle / virvele; Ant piršto maunamas žiedas; Pakabinamas žymeklis (su karabinu); Užrakinamas akių žymeklis (segtukas / užraktas); Magnetinis (prie priedo); Tvirtinamas ant virbalo; Skeltas žiedas; Atskiras (be tvirtinimo); Kita
en: Row counter mounting method: Chain/cord lanyard; Finger ring; Hanging marker (lobster clasp); Locking stitch marker (clip/lock); Magnetic (to accessory); Needle-mounted; Split ring; Standalone (no attachment); Other
da: Fastgørelsesmetode for rækketæller: Kæde-/snorestrop; Fingerring; Hængende markør (karabinlås); Låsbar maskemarkør (klemme/lås); Magnetisk (til tilbehør); Monteret på pind; Delt ring; Fritstående (ingen fastgørelse); Andet
pt-BR: Contador de carreiras método de fixação: Cordão de colar/corrente; Anel de dedo; Marcador pendurado (fecho lagosta); Marcador de ponto com trava (clipe/trava); Magnético (para acessório); Montado na agulha; Argola dividida; Independente (sem fixação); Outro
sk-SK: Spôsob montáže počítadla riadkov: Retiazka/šnúrka na krk; Prsteň; Závesná značka (karabínka); Zamykacia značka oka (spona/zámok); Magnetické (na príslušenstvo); Upevnené na ihlicu; Rozdelený krúžok; Samostatné (bez upevnenia); Iné